Tennessee, session 114, SB2529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 23, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "adult-sized changing table" means a powered,
height-adjustable platform in a single occupancy family restroom.
(b) If a rest area or welcome center has an adult-sized changing table, then the
department of transportation shall install a sign or marker displaying a symbol indicating
the accessibility of an adult-sized changing table to motorists, or include that symbol on
an existing rest area or welcome center sign or marker, on the portions of the interstate
system and state system of highways and associated rights-of-way near the rest area or
welcome center.
(c) The department may consult the department of tourist development in
manufacturing and installing the signs or markers or designating or placing symbols on
signs or markers pursuant to this section.
(d) Symbols, signs, and markers installed pursuant to this section must be
consistent with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices (MUTCD) and the state
supplemental guidelines, as applicable.
(e) The department shall publish on its website the locations of rest areas and
welcome centers that have adult-sized changing tables.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2529
011405
- 1 -